Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 38 Professional Counselors, Marriage and Family Therapists, Social Workers and Chemical Dependency Specialists
§ 33-38-106.
Requirements for licensure and certification.

The board shall issue a license as a professional counselor, marriage and family therapist, clinical social worker or addictions therapist to any applicant who files an application upon a form and in the manner prescribed by the board, accompanied by the appropriate fee and who furnishes satisfactory evidence to the board of the following:

The applicant has reached the age of majority;

The applicant has no felony convictions and no misdemeanor convictions that relate adversely to the practice of counseling, marriage and family therapy, clinical social work or addictions therapy or to the ability to practice counseling, marriage and family therapy, clinical social work or addictions therapy, although exceptions to this requirement may be granted by the board if consistent with the public interest;

The applicant has received a master’s or doctorate degree in one (1) of the disciplines identified from an accredited program and institution of higher education, which is professional in content and which meets the academic and training content standards established by the board. The board shall use the professional training and experience standards of the appropriate professional associations as established by the rules and regulations;

The applicant has demonstrated knowledge of one (1) of the fields of professional counseling, marriage and family therapy, clinical social work or addictions therapy in general by passing a standard examination which may be written or situational, as the board prescribes. The board may develop, adopt and administer appropriate examinations. The board shall establish specific provisions for examination of applicants for licensure in the specific discipline at reasonable times and places at least twice each year;

The applicant has demonstrated that he has completed three thousand (3,000) hours of supervised clinical experience including a minimum of one hundred (100) hours of face-to-face individual clinical supervision from a qualified clinical supervisor.

Certification under this subsection shall allow practice as a certified social worker only under the supervision of a qualified clinical supervisor and subject to any other restrictions which may be specified by the board. The board shall grant certification as a certified social worker to any applicant who files an application upon a form and in the manner prescribed by the board, accompanied by the appropriate fee and who furnishes satisfactory evidence to the board of the following:

The applicant has reached the age of majority;

The applicant has no felony convictions and no misdemeanor convictions that relate adversely to the practice of clinical social work or to the ability to practice clinical social work, although exceptions to this requirement may be granted by the board if consistent with the public interest;

The applicant has received a baccalaureate degree in social work from an accredited program and institution of higher education, which is professional in content and which meets the academic and training content standards established by the board. The board shall use the professional training and experience standards of the appropriate professional associations as established by the rules and regulations;

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 51, § 2.

The applicant has demonstrated knowledge in the field of social work in general by passing a standard examination which may be written or situational, as the board prescribes. The board may develop, adopt and administer appropriate examinations. The board shall establish specific provisions for examination of applicants for certification in the specific discipline at reasonable times and places at least twice each year;

Unless extended, the applicant has six (6) months from the date of employment to become certified. The board may, for good cause shown, grant an extension of this grace period.

Certification under this subsection shall allow practice as a certified addictions practitioner only under the supervision of a qualified clinical supervisor and subject to any other restrictions which may be specified by the board. The board shall grant certification as a certified addictions practitioner to any applicant who files an application upon a form and in the manner prescribed by the board, accompanied by the appropriate fee and who furnishes satisfactory evidence to the board of the following:

The applicant has reached the age of majority;

The applicant has no felony convictions and no misdemeanor convictions that relate adversely to the practice of addictions therapy or to the ability to practice addictions therapy, although exceptions to this requirement may be granted by the board if consistent with the public interest;

The applicant has received a baccalaureate degree in a human behavioral discipline from a regionally accredited institution of higher education, which is professional in content and which meets national standards for accreditation in the field of addiction therapy as accepted by the board, or has received a baccalaureate level equivalency in addiction therapy. In performing its duties under this paragraph, the board shall consult the professional training and experience standards of appropriate national professional associations or the standards of an appropriate federal agency;

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 51, § 2.

The applicant has demonstrated knowledge in the field of addictions treatment in general by passing a standard examination which may be written or situational, as the board prescribes. The board may develop, adopt and administer appropriate examinations. The board shall establish specific provisions for examination of applicants for certification in the specific discipline at reasonable times and places at least twice each year;

Unless extended, the applicant has six (6) months from the date of employment to become certified. The board may, for good cause shown, grant an extension of this grace period;

Notwithstanding paragraphs (iii) and (vi) of this subsection, a person who has received a baccalaureate degree in a human behavioral discipline, other than a degree in addiction therapy, may be granted certification under this subsection after providing to the board satisfactory proof of completion of two thousand (2,000) hours of supervised work experience as a certified addictions practitioner assistant or equivalent in the field of addiction therapy.

Provisional licensure is a means to continue progress towards satisfactory completion of all licensure requirements under this act. Upon review and approval by the designated board member or board, the board shall issue a provisional license to any applicant who files an application upon a form and in the manner prescribed by the board, accompanied by the appropriate fee and who furnishes satisfactory evidence to the board of the following:

The applicant has reached the age of majority;

The applicant has no felony convictions and no misdemeanor convictions that relate adversely to the practice of counseling, marriage and family therapy, clinical social work or addictions therapy or to the ability to practice counseling, marriage and family therapy, clinical social work or addictions therapy, although exemptions to this requirement may be granted by the board if consistent with public interest;

The applicant meets any of the following educational requirements:

Holds a master’s or doctorate degree in one (1) of the disciplines identified from an accredited program and institution of higher education which is professional in content and which meets the academic and training content standards established by the board; or

Holds a master’s or doctorate degree which is clinical in content from a regionally accredited institution of higher education in one (1) of the disciplines identified. During the term of provisional licensure under this subsection, the applicant shall complete any program deficiencies required to meet the academic and training content standards established by the board; or

Holds a license for independent clinical practice in good standing in the identified discipline for another licensing jurisdiction which does not meet the criteria for reciprocal licensure under this act. During the term of provisional licensure under this subsection, the applicant shall complete any program deficiencies required to meet the academic and training content standards established by the board.

The provisional licensed professional counselor, clinical social worker, marriage and family therapist and addictions therapist shall be allowed to practice only under the supervision of a qualified clinical supervisor and in accordance with any other restrictions specified by the board;

Unless extended, the provisional license shall expire thirty-six (36) months after issuance or upon issuance of a license by the board under this act, whichever occurs first;

The board may, for good cause shown, grant an extension of a provisional license subject to any additional restrictions specified by the board.

through (m) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 37, § 2.

Certification under this subsection shall allow practice as a certified addictions practitioner assistant only under the supervision of a qualified clinical supervisor and subject to any other restrictions which may be specified by the board. Unless extended, an applicant has six (6) months from the date of employment to become certified. The board may for good cause grant an extension of this period. The board shall grant certification as a certified addictions practitioner assistant to any applicant who files an application upon a form and in the manner prescribed by the board, accompanied by the appropriate fee and who furnishes satisfactory evidence to the board of the following:

The applicant has completed two hundred seventy (270) contact hours of education and training in alcoholism and drug abuse or related counseling subjects that meet the academic and training content standards established by the board. The board shall use the professional training standards of the appropriate professional association as established by the rules and regulation;

The applicant has reached the age of majority;

The applicant has no felony convictions and no misdemeanor convictions that relate adversely to the practice of addictions therapy or to the ability to practice as an addictions practitioner assistant, although exceptions to this requirement may be granted by the board if consistent with the public interest;

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 51, § 2.

The applicant has demonstrated knowledge in the field of addictions treatment in general by passing a standard examination which may be written and situational, as the board prescribes. The board may develop, adopt and administer appropriate examinations. The board shall establish specific provisions for examination of applicants for certification in the specific discipline at reasonable times and places at least twice each year.

Upon examination of all credentials the board may consider the credentials adequate evidence of professional competence and recommend to the chairperson of the board that a license or certification be approved.

Persons currently licensed in one (1) of these disciplines in this state as of July 1, 1997 in a discipline required to be licensed under this act, shall be presumed to have met all requirements for licensure under this act and shall be eligible for renewal of licensure in accordance with the provisions of this act.

Certification under this subsection shall allow practice as a certified mental health worker only under the supervision of a qualified clinical supervisor and subject to any other restrictions which may be specified by the board. The board shall grant certification as a certified mental health worker to any applicant who files an application upon a form and in the manner prescribed by the board, accompanied by the appropriate fee and who furnishes satisfactory evidence to the board of the following:

The applicant has reached the age of majority;

The applicant has no felony convictions and no misdemeanor convictions that relate adversely to the practice of clinical mental health work or to the ability to practice clinical mental health work, although exceptions to this requirement may be granted by the board if consistent with the public interest;

The applicant has received a baccalaureate degree in a human behavioral discipline from an accredited program and institution of higher education, which is professional in content and which meets the academic and training content standards established by the board. The board shall use the professional training and experience standards of the appropriate professional associations as established by the rules and regulations;

The applicant has demonstrated knowledge in the field of mental health work in general by passing a standard examination which may be written or situational, as the board prescribes. The board may develop, adopt and administer appropriate examinations. The board shall establish specific provisions for examination of applicants for certification in the specific discipline at reasonable times and places at least twice each year;

Unless extended, the applicant has six (6) months from the date of employment to become certified. The board may, for good cause shown, grant an extension of this grace period.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 239, § 1; 1993, ch. 181, § 2; 1997, ch. 153, § 1; 2001, ch. 111, § 1; ch. 204, § 1; 2008, ch. 51, §§ 1, 2; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 4, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 37, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to age of majority and rights upon emancipation, see §

14-1-101

.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added the first sentence in (b) and (c); repealed former (b)(iv) which read: “The applicant has a designated clinical supervisor”; repealed former (c)(iv) which read: “The applicant has a designated clinical supervisor”; substituted “reached the age of majority” for “satisfied all requirements for licensure other than the requirements for examination and completion of the required hours of supervised clinical experience” in (d)(i); inserted (d)(iii) and redesignated the remaining paragraphs accordingly; in (n), added the first three sentences; and repealed (n)(iv) which read: “The applicant has a designated clinical supervisor licensed under this act who is not supervising any other addictions practitioner assistant.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(ii), (b)(ii), (c)(ii), (d)(ii), (e)(iii), (j)(ii), (k)(ii), (m)(ii), and (n)(iii), substituted “that relate adversely to” for “involving moral turpitude” following “misdemeanor convictions,” and in each instance inserted a phrase specifying the practice area or areas to be licensed or certified preceding “although.”

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 4, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote (c)(iii), which read "The applicant has received a baccalaureate degree in a human behavioral discipline from a regionally accredited institution of higher education, which is professional in content and which meets national standards for accreditation in the field of addiction therapy as accepted by the board, or has received a baccalaureate level equivalency in addiction therapy. In performing its duties under this paragraph, the board shall consult the professional training and experience standards of appropriate national professional associations or the standards of an appropriate federal agency"; and added (c)(vii).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, added (q).

The third 2021 amendment, by ch. 37, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (e) through (m).

While neither amendment gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

An internal reference to § 33-38-103(a)(iv) through (vii) in paragraphs (e)(iv), (f)(ii), (g)(ii), (h)(ii), (j)(i), and (m)(i) has been changed to § 33-38-102(a)(iv) through (vii) at the direction of the Wyoming Legislative Service Office. The reference was correct in paragraph (k)(iv) as amended.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 33-38-102(a)(xiv).

Section's provisions violate equal protection. —

The prerequisites to licensure found in this section, the licensure exemptions set forth in §

33-38-103

and the mandatory licensure provisions under §

33-38-110

, violate guarantees of equal protection under art. 1, §§ 2 and 34, Wyo. Const. and art. 3, § 27, Wyo. Const.; these provisions must be stricken as contrary to guarantees of equal protection, the guarantee of uniform operation of laws, and as special legislation. The unconstitutional provisions are of no effect, and the law in the form it existed prior to the 1993 amendments is controlling. Allhusen v. State, 898 P.2d 878,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1995), (decided prior to 2001 amendments to the Mental Health Professions Practice Act).

Cited

in

In re Licensure of Jerry Penny v. State Ex Rel. Wyoming Mental Health Professions Licensing Bd., 2005 WY 117, 120 P.3d 152,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(2005).

§ 33-38-107.
Renewal of license and continuing education.

Persons licensed or certified under this act shall submit biennially the appropriate renewal fee at a time specified by the board. The renewal request shall be accompanied by evidence satisfactory to the board of compliance with this act and participation in continuing education activities as established by rules and regulations of the board.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 239, § 1; 1997, ch. 153, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 33-38-102(a)(xiv).

Cited

in

In re Licensure of Jerry Penny v. State Ex Rel. Wyoming Mental Health Professions Licensing Bd., 2005 WY 117, 120 P.3d 152,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(2005).

§ 33-38-108.
Reciprocity.

Any individual holding a license in good standing to engage in the practice of professional counseling, clinical social work, marriage and family therapy or addictions therapy under the laws of another state having licensure requirements substantially similar to those required by this act may, upon approval of the board, be issued a license to practice in this state.

Any individual holding a certification in good standing to engage in the practice of social work, addictions therapy or mental health work under the laws of another state having certification requirements substantially similar to those required by this act may, upon approval of the board, be issued certification to practice in this state.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations setting forth the manner in which credentials shall be reviewed by the board.

For good cause shown the board shall issue a license or certification to practice in this state to an individual seeking reciprocity as a social worker, addictions practitioner, addictions practitioner assistant or mental health worker who does not otherwise meet the reciprocity requirements under subsection (a) or (b) of this section.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 239, § 1; 1993, ch. 181, § 2; 1997, ch. 153, § 1; 2001, ch. 204, § 1; 2008, ch. 51, § 1; 2021 ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, rewrote the section, adding subsection designations and modifying certification and provisional licensing requirements.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in (b), added "or mental health work" and made a related change; and added (d).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 33-38-102(a)(xiv).

§ 33-38-109.
Disclosure of information.

A person licensed or certified under this act shall not disclose without consent of the client any communication made by the client to the licensed or certified professional in the course of professional practice, nor may any employee of the licensed or certified professional reveal the information without the consent of the employer or client except as indicated by law.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 181, § 3.

A person licensed or certified under this act shall not reveal without the consent of the client or the client’s legal advisor his advice given in the course of professional employment; nor shall a secretary, stenographer, clerk or other employee of any person licensed or certified under this act reveal, without the consent of his employer or the client, any facts, the knowledge of which he has acquired in such capacity.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 239, § 1; 1993, ch. 181, § 3; 1997, ch. 153, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 33-38-102(a)(xiv).

§ 33-38-110.
Prohibited acts; penalties.

No person shall:

Engage in the practice of professional counseling, clinical social work, marriage and family therapy or addictions therapy unless licensed or certified to so practice under this act or to represent himself to the public as being licensed as a professional counselor, a clinical social worker, a marriage and family therapist or as an addiction therapist, or certified as a certified social worker or certified addictions practitioner, certified mental health worker, or to represent himself to the public as a professional counselor, a clinical social worker, a social worker, mental health worker, a marriage and family therapist, an addictions therapist or an addictions practitioner without having first complied with this act;

Engage in the professional practice of counseling, clinical social work, marriage and family therapy, or addictions therapy and fail to provide a professional disclosure statement as provided in W.S.

33-38-111

except as exempted by W.S.

33-38-103

or other law.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 181, § 3.

The board may refuse to renew, or may deny, suspend, revoke or otherwise restrict licensure or certification under this act for any of the following causes:

Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor that relates adversely to the practice of counseling, marriage and family therapy, clinical social work or addictions therapy or to the ability to practice counseling, marriage and family therapy, clinical social work or addictions therapy, including pleas of nolo contendere. A certified copy of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction;

Renting or lending the license or certificate issued pursuant to this act to any person planning to use that license or certificate;

Unprofessional or unethical conduct;

Gross incompetence and malpractice;

Mental incompetency;

Knowingly submitting false or misleading information to the board in any application for examination, licensure or certification;

Habitual intemperate use of alcohol or a controlled substance;

Violation and conviction of a charge under the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act [§

35-7-1001

et seq.];

Willful violation of any provisions of this act;

Sexual exploitation of a patient, defined as:

Any verbal behavior by a licensee or certificate holder under this chapter which involves offers of exchange of professional services for some form of sexual gratification; or

Unlawful or unprofessional sexual contact with a client.

Failure to make timely application for licensure, certification or renewal thereof or to meet the continuing education requirements prior to the license or certificate expiration date.

Proceedings under this section may be taken by the board from matters within its knowledge or upon information from another. If the informant is a member of the board, the other members of the board shall judge the accused. All complaints shall be in writing, verified by some party familiar with the facts alleged, and shall be filed with the board. Upon receiving the complaint the board, if it deems the complaint sufficient, shall proceed as in a contested case under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§

16-3-101

et seq.]. Upon revocation of any license or certification, the fact shall be noted upon the records of the board and the license or certification shall be marked cancelled upon the date of its revocation. Any suspension issued by the board pursuant to this section shall be for a period not greater than one (1) year and any licensee or certificate holder sanctioned shall not be allowed to practice in this state until completion of the suspension period and timely review by the board. The sanction of revocation upon order of the board shall be for a stated period not to exceed three (3) years, and a person whose license or certification has been revoked may not apply for reinstatement until thirty (30) days before the end of the stated period of revocation.

Persons violating this act are guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both. A third or subsequent conviction for violation of this section during a thirty-six (36) month period shall constitute a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or both. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

The board may seek an injunction in the district court to enjoin any person from violating this act.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 239, § 1; 1993, ch. 181, §§ 2, 3; 1997, ch. 153, § 1; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (c)(i), in the first sentence, substituted
“that relates adversely to the practice of counseling, marriage
and family therapy, clinical social work or addictions therapy or
to the ability to practice counseling, marriage and family therapy,
clinical social work or addictions therapy,” for “involving
moral turpitude” following “misdemeanor.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 33-38-102(a)(xiv).

Section's provisions violate equal protection. —

The mandatory licensure provisions under this section, the prerequisites to licensure found in §

33-38-106

, and the licensure exemptions set forth in §

33-38-103

violate guarantees of equal protection under art. 1, §§ 2 and 34, Wyo. Const. and art. 3, § 27, Wyo. Const.; these provisions must be stricken as contrary to guarantees of equal protection, the guarantee of uniform operation of laws, and as special legislation. The unconstitutional provisions are of no effect, and the law in the form it existed prior to the 1993 amendments is controlling. Allhusen v. State, 898 P.2d 878,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1995), (decided prior to 2001 amendments to the Mental Health Professions Practice Act).

Denial of re-licensure proper. —

Where appellant was denied re-licensure of his clinical social work license under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 33-38-110(c), the Wyoming Mental Health Professions Licensing Board was not required to present expert testimony that appellant violated Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 33-38-102(a)(iii) and (v) by representing himself as a clinical social worker and practicing clinical social work without a license because the re-licensure was denied on the grounds that appellant violated Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 33-38-110(a)(i) and (c)(iii), the Board meticulously detailed in its order the applicable statutory and administrative standards, including the ethical codes adopted therein and further, the evidence fully supported the conclusion that the appellant engaged in practices clearly identified in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 33-38-102(a)(v) as ‘clinical social work,’ including diagnosis and counseling. In re Licensure of Jerry Penny v. State ex rel. Wyo. Mental Health Professions Licensing Bd., 2005 WY 117, 120 P.3d 152,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2005).

§ 33-38-111.
Protection of the public; professional disclosure.

Any individual licensed or certified under this act is required to conspicuously display a professional disclosure statement at his place of business or at the principal location where his services are performed and to provide a copy of the statement to each adult client, or in the case of a minor to the minor’s parent or guardian, before or during the first session and upon request. The professional disclosure statement shall contain the licensee’s or certificate holder’s name, title, business address and telephone number, listing of formal professional education with name of institution attended and specific degrees received, licensure status or certificates currently held, statement of confidentiality, a statement that the professional ethical code of the discipline will be followed, including a statement that sexual intimacy with a client is never appropriate and a statement that the disclosure statement is required by the Mental Health Professions Licensing Act. The disclosure statement may also contain a listing of areas of specialization, including major course of study.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 181, § 1; 1997, ch. 153, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 33-38-102(a)(xiv).

§ 33-38-112.
Limitation of practice.

All licensees and certificate holders shall adhere to the ethical standards of their discipline, and according to those promulgated in the rules and regulations of the board.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 181, § 1; 1997, ch. 153, § 1.

§ 33-38-113.
Privileged communication.

In judicial proceedings, whether civil, criminal, or juvenile, in administrative proceedings, and in proceedings preliminary and ancillary thereto, a patient or client, or his guardian or personal representative, may refuse to disclose and may prevent the disclosure of confidential information, including information contained in administrative records, communicated to a person licensed or otherwise authorized to practice under this act, and their agents, for the purpose of diagnosis, evaluation or treatment of any mental or emotional condition or disorder. A person licensed or otherwise authorized to practice under this act shall not disclose any information communicated as described above in the absence of an express waiver of the privilege except in the following circumstances:

Where abuse or harmful neglect of children, the elderly or disabled or incompetent individuals is known or reasonably suspected;

Where the validity of a will of a former patient or client is contested;

Where such information is necessary to defend against a malpractice action brought by the patient or client;

Where an immediate threat of physical violence against a readily identifiable victim is disclosed to the person licensed or otherwise authorized to practice under this act;

In the context of civil commitment proceedings, where an immediate threat of self-inflicted damage is disclosed to the person licensed or otherwise authorized to practice under this act;

Where the patient or client alleges mental or emotional damages in civil litigation or otherwise places his mental or emotional state in issue in any judicial or administrative proceeding concerning child custody or visitation;

Where the patient or client is examined pursuant to court order; or

In the context of investigations and hearings brought by the patient or client and conducted by the board where violations of this act are at issue. Information that is deemed to be of sensitive nature shall be inspected by the board in camera and the board shall determine whether or not the information shall become a part of the record and subject to public disclosure.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 147, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 33-38-102(a)(xiv).

Disclosure of privileged information. —

Although it was error for the sentencing court to allow on cross-examination a substance abuse therapist to disclose information privileged under § 33-38-113(a) concerning the defendant, specifically, that defendant was involved in the sale and use of controlled substance, the error was harmless in light of defendant's extensive criminal record, including more than twenty-five serious felony and misdemeanor convictions, including at least one for possessing and one for delivering a controlled substance, coupled with the presentence investigation recommendation that defendant be sentenced to the maximum penalty. Cooper v. State, 2002 WY 78, 46 P.3d 884,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 2002).

District court did not err by allowing a mother's mental health providers to testify to privileged communications because the mother was not entitled to reinstate the privilege for information that was previously disclosed pursuant to an “express waiver” of the privilege; even without the express waivers, the evidence was admissible at trial because there was reasonable cause to believe or suspect that the child was being subjected to conditions or circumstances that would result in neglect. Cave v. State (In re GAC), 2017 WY 65, 396 P.3d 411,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2017).

District court did not err by allowing a mother's mental health providers to testify to privileged communications because the mother signed a release; the release was an express waiver of the privilege because it clearly and unmistakably conveyed the mother's intent to relinquish her statutory right to the privilege by allowing the provider to release information to Department of Family Services. Cave v. State (In re GAC), 2017 WY 65, 396 P.3d 411,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2017).

Where, in a father's action for modification of custody, the child's mother claimed that her mental health records were privileged pursuant to this section, even if the district court erred in ordering production of the mother's mental health records, the mother could not establish prejudicial error, as she did not produce them.
BB v. RSR, 2007 WY 4, 149 P.3d 727,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 2

(Wyo. 2007).

Substance abuse treatment records. —

On their face, the privileges protect confidential information communicated by a patient to her treatment provider for the purpose of diagnosis, evaluation or treatment of any mental or emotional condition or disorder unless the patient alleges mental or emotional damages in litigation; plaintiff’s substance abuse treatment records were not privileged under the exceptions contained in Wyo. Stat. §§

33-27-123

(vi) and

33-38-113

(vi) because plaintiff alleged mental and emotional damages in this litigation by seeking damages for loss of enjoyment of life. Vahai v. Gertsch, 2020 WY 7, 455 P.3d 1218,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 2020).

Exception to privilege. —

There is no indication that the legislature intended to repeal Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-3-210

when it enacted Wyo. Stat Ann. §

33-38-113

, and the two statutes are complementary; section

33-38-113

(a)(i) provides an exception to the privilege where abuse or harmful neglect of children, the elderly or disabled or incompetent individuals is known or reasonably suspected, and this exception is entirely consistent with §

14-3-210

.Cave v. State (In re GAC), 2017 WY 65, 396 P.3d 411,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2017).

Statutory exceptions to the privilege recognize that other legitimate concerns sometimes take precedence over the confidentiality guaranteed by the privilege; it is up to the legislature, not the supreme court, to weigh the competing policies and decide when a claim of privilege should and should not be allowed. Cave v. State (In re GAC), 2017 WY 65, 396 P.3d 411,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2017).

No waiver. —

It was not error to deny a practitioner access to a complainant's mental health information under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 33-27-123(a)(iii) or this section as the complainant did not allege mental or emotional damages in underlying litigation, nor did she file a malpractice action against the practitioner. She merely filed a disciplinary complaint against him.
Greene v. State ex rel. Wyo. Bd. of Chiropractic Examiners, 2009 WY 42, 204 P.3d 285,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2009).

It was not error to deny a practitioner access to a complainant's mental health information under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 33-27-123(a)(iii) or this section as the complainant did not allege mental or emotional damages in underlying litigation, nor did she file a malpractice action against the practitioner. She merely filed a disciplinary complaint against him.
Greene v. State ex rel. Wyo. Bd. of Chiropractic Examiners, 2009 WY 42, 204 P.3d 285,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2009).